Mississippi statutes. Title 79. Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Article 4. Governance.

§79-10-61.
Voting of shares.

Only a qualified person may be appointed a proxy to vote shares of a professional corporation.

A voting trust with respect to shares of a professional corporation is not valid unless all of its trustees and beneficiaries are qualified persons. But if a beneficiary who is a qualified person dies or becomes disqualified, a voting trust valid under this subsection continues to be valid for ten (10) months after the date of death or for five (5) months after the disqualification occurred.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 494, § 18, eff from and after July 1, 1995.

Disqualified person and qualified person defined, see § 79-10-5.

§79-10-63.
Confidential relationship.

The relationship between an individual rendering professional services as an employee of a domestic or foreign professional corporation and his client or patient is the same as if the individual were rendering the services as a sole practitioner.

The relationship between a domestic or foreign professional corporation and the client or patient for whom its employee is rendering professional services is the same as that between the client or patient and the employee.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 494, § 19, eff from and after July 1, 1995.

Foreign professional corporations generally, see §§ 79-10-91 through 79-10-95.

Given the conclusion that an affair between the client’s wife and the attorney was not related to the representation or arising therefrom, along with the client’s admission that the affair was not motivated by a desire to benefit the law firm and the absence of any evidence that anyone at the law firm, other than the attorney, was aware of the secret and covert affair prior to the client’s demand, that was the type of frolic so clearly beyond an employee’s course and scope of employment that it could not form the basis for a claim of vicarious liability on the part of the law firm, Miss. Code Ann. §§ 79-10-63(2), 79-10-67(2). Baker Donelson Bearman Caldwell & Berkowitz, P.C. v. Seay, 42 So.3d 474, 2010 Miss. LEXIS 291 (Miss. 2010).

§79-10-65.
Privileged communications.

A privilege applicable to communications between an individual rendering professional services and the person receiving the services recognized under the statute or common law of this state is not affected by this chapter. The privilege applies to a domestic or foreign professional corporation and to its employees in all situations in which it applies to communications between an individual rendering professional services on behalf of the corporation and the person receiving the services.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 494, § 20, eff from and after July 1, 1995.

Foreign professional corporations generally, see §§ 79-10-91 through 79-10-95.

§79-10-67.
Responsibility for professional services.

Each individual who renders professional services as an employee of a domestic or foreign professional corporation is liable for a negligent or wrongful act or omission in which he personally participates to the same extent as if he rendered the services as a sole practitioner. An employee or shareholder of a domestic or foreign professional corporation is not liable, however, for the conduct of other employees or shareholders of the corporation, except a person under his direct supervision and control, while rendering professional services on behalf of the professional corporation to the person for whom such professional services were being rendered.

A domestic or foreign professional corporation whose employees perform professional services within the scope of their employment or of their apparent authority to act for the corporation is liable to the same extent as its employees.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 494, § 21, eff from and after July 1, 1995.

Foreign professional corporations generally, see §§ 79-10-91 through 79-10-95.

Given the conclusion that an affair between the client’s wife and the attorney was not related to the representation or arising therefrom, along with the client’s admission that the affair was not motivated by a desire to benefit the law firm and the absence of any evidence that anyone at the law firm, other than the attorney, was aware of the secret and covert affair prior to the client’s demand, that was the type of frolic so clearly beyond an employee’s course and scope of employment that it could not form the basis for a claim of vicarious liability on the part of the law firm, Miss. Code Ann. §§ 79-10-63(2), 79-10-67(2). Baker Donelson Bearman Caldwell & Berkowitz, P.C. v. Seay, 42 So.3d 474, 2010 Miss. LEXIS 291 (Miss. 2010).

Appellate court could not, as a matter of law, determine that the entire liability was attributable to the errors of the architect; thus, it reversed and remanded for a new trial to determine what portion, if any, of the architectural firm’s liability may be imposed to the architect individually. Lambert Cmty. Hous. Group, L.P. v. Wenzel, 987 So. 2d 468, 2008 Miss. App. LEXIS 383 (Miss. Ct. App. 2008).

18B Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 1715-1866.

19 C.J.S., Corporations §§ 651 et seq.